Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.15.060

Receiver—Qualification—Bond—When receiver may be appointed.

The receiver shall qualify and post a bond as provided in RCW 35.07.120. If an elected receiver fails to qualify within the time prescribed, or if no receiver has been elected and the code city does have indebtedness or an outstanding liability, a receiver shall be appointed in the manner provided in RCW 35.07.130 or as provided in RCW 35.07.140.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.15.060.]